src/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON JOVKEMES
              +N+Sg+Nom:%>%^COMPDISIMP3es%^DISIMP FINAL1   ;
              +N+Sg+Acc:asse%>m                   FINAL1   ;
              +N+Sg+Gen:asse%>n                   FINAL1   ;
              +N+Sg+Ill:asse%>se                  FINAL1   ;
              +N+Sg+Ine:asse%>sne                 FINAL1   ;
              +N+Sg+Ela:asse%>ste                 FINAL1   ;
              +N+Sg+Com:ass%>ine                  FINAL1   ;
              +N+Pl+Nom:%>ass%>h                  FINAL1   ;
              +N+Pl+Acc:%>ass%>ide                FINAL1   ;
              +N+Pl+Gen:%>ass%>i                  FINAL1   ;
              +N+Pl+Ill:%>ass%>ide                FINAL1   ;
              +N+Pl+Ine:%>ass%>ine                FINAL1   ;
              +N+Pl+Ela:%>ass%>ijste              FINAL1   ;
              +N+Pl+Com:%>ass%>igujmie            FINAL1   ;
                     +N:ass                       EVEN_ESS ;
            +N+Cmp/SgNom:%>%^COMPDISIMP3es%^DISIMP R        ;
            +N+Cmp/SgGen:asse%>n                   R        ;
            +N+Cmp/PlGen:ass%>i                    R        ;
        +N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1:ass%>eme                  FINAL1   ;
        +N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2:ass%>edh                  FINAL1   ;
        +N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3:ass%>se                   FINAL1   ;
        +N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1:ass%>eme                  FINAL1   ;
 +N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1+Use/NG:ass%>emem                 FINAL1   ;
        +N+Sg+Acc+PxSg2:ass%>emdh                 FINAL1   ;
        +N+Sg+Acc+PxSg3:asse%>mse                 FINAL1   ;
        +N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1:ass%>ene                  FINAL1   ;
        +N+Sg+Ill+PxSg1:ass%>esanne               FINAL1   ;
        +N+Sg+Ill+PxSg2:ass%>esadth               FINAL1   ;
        +N+Sg+Ela+PxSg1:ass%>estanne              FINAL1   ;
 +N+Sg+Ela+PxSg1+Use/NG:ass%>estadth              FINAL1   ;
        +N+Sg+Com+PxSg2:ass%>enadth               FINAL1   ;


LEXICON NES
             +N+Sg+Nom:%>%^COMPDISIMP2es%^DISIMP FINAL1   ;
             +N+Sg+Acc:asse%>m                   FINAL1   ;
             +N+Sg+Gen:asse%>n                   FINAL1   ;
             +N+Sg+Ill:asse%>se                  FINAL1   ;
             +N+Sg+Ine:asse%>sne                 FINAL1   ;
             +N+Sg+Ela:asse%>ste                 FINAL1   ;
             +N+Sg+Com:ass%>ine                  FINAL1   ;
             +N+Pl+Nom:%>ass%>h                  FINAL1   ;
             +N+Pl+Acc:%>ass%>ide                FINAL1   ;
             +N+Pl+Gen:%>ass%>%^DISIMPi          FINAL1   ;
             +N+Pl+Ill:%>ass%>ide                FINAL1   ;
             +N+Pl+Ine:%>ass%>ine                FINAL1   ;
             +N+Pl+Ela:%>ass%>ijste              FINAL1   ;
             +N+Pl+Com:%>ass%>igujmie            FINAL1   ;
                     +N:ass                       EVEN_ESS ;
            +N+Cmp/SgNom:%>%^COMPDISIMP2es%^DISIMP R        ;
            +N+Cmp/SgGen:asse%>n                   R        ;
            +N+Cmp/PlGen:ass%>i                    R        ;
        +N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1:ass%>eme                  FINAL1   ;
        +N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2:ass%>edh                  FINAL1   ;
        +N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3:ass%>se                   FINAL1   ;
        +N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1:ass%>eme                  FINAL1   ;
 +N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1+Use/NG:ass%>emem                 FINAL1   ;
        +N+Sg+Acc+PxSg2:ass%>emdh                 FINAL1   ;
        +N+Sg+Acc+PxSg3:asse%>mse                 FINAL1   ;
        +N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1:ass%>ene                  FINAL1   ;
        +N+Sg+Ill+PxSg1:ass%>esanne               FINAL1   ;
        +N+Sg+Ill+PxSg2:ass%>esadth               FINAL1   ;
        +N+Sg+Ela+PxSg1:ass%>estanne              FINAL1   ;
 +N+Sg+Ela+PxSg1+Use/NG:ass%>estadth              FINAL1   ;
        +N+Sg+Com+PxSg2:ass%>enadth               FINAL1   ;



LEXICON KONTO  !!= @CODE@ Lexicon for vowel-final words with invariant stems"
!! {{{
 +N: KONTODECL ; !!= @CODE@
!! }}}
LEXICON KONTODECL !!= @CODE@ Lexicon for vowel-final words with invariant stems"
!! {{{
               +Sg:     KONTO_SG ; !!= @CODE@
               +Pl:     KONTO_PL ; !!= @CODE@
                        EVEN_ESS ; !!= @CODE@
         +Cmp/SgNom:     R        ; !!= @CODE@
         +Cmp/SgGen:%>n  R        ; !!= @CODE@
         +Cmp/PlGen:%>j  R        ; !!= @CODE@
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N:%»tj GÅATETJE ; !!= @CODE@
!! }}}

LEXICON KONTO_SG
 +Nom:      FINAL1 ;
 +Acc:%>m   FINAL1 ;
 +Gen:%>n   FINAL1 ;
 +Ill:%>se  FINAL1 ;
 +Ine:%>sne FINAL1 ;
 +Ela:%>ste FINAL1 ;
 +Com:%>ine FINAL1 ;
 
! waiting with the Px forms for these (?) loanwords
!  +Nom+PxSg1:%>me FINAL1 ;
!  +Nom+PxSg2:%>dh FINAL1 ;
!  +Nom+PxSg3:%>se FINAL1 ;
!  +Acc+PxSg1:%>me FINAL1 ;
!  +Acc+PxSg1+Use/NG:%>mem FINAL1 ;
!  +Acc+PxSg2:%>mdh FINAL1 ;
!  +Acc+PxSg3:e%>mse FINAL1 ;
!  +Gen+PxSg1:%>ne FINAL1 ;
!  +Ill+PxSg1:%>asanne FINAL1 ;
!  +Ill+PxSg2:%>asadth FINAL1 ;
!  +Ela+PxSg1:%>astanne FINAL1 ;
!  +Ela+PxSg1+Use/NG:%>astadth FINAL1 ;
!  +Com+PxSg2:%>anadth FINAL1 ;

LEXICON KONTO_PL
         +Nom:%>h       FINAL1 ;
         +Acc:%>ide     FINAL1 ;
         +Gen:%>j       FINAL1 ;
         +Ill:%>ide     FINAL1 ;
         +Ine:%>ine     FINAL1 ;
         +Ela:%>ijste   FINAL1 ;
         +Com:%>jgujmie FINAL1 ;
 +Com+Err/Orth:%>jgyjmie FINAL1 ;

LEXICON MARS
 +N+Sg+Nom: FINAL1 ; ! mars
            NIEJTE ; ! marse


LEXICON JUNI
   +N+Sg+Nom:i    FINAL1      ; !juni
       +N+Sg:     NIEJTESGOBL ; ! junesne
       +N+Pl:     NIEJTE_PL   ;
 +N+Cmp/SgNom:i    R           ;
 +N+Cmp/SgGen:e%>n R           ;
 +N+Cmp/PlGen:%>i  R           ;
          +N:     EVEN_ESS    ;

LEXICON NOM-CMP
+N+Sg+Nom+Use/NG: FINAL1 ;
+N+Cmp/SgNom: R ;


! Sub-paradigm inflections:
! -------------------------

LEXICON EVEN_ESS
 +Ess:%>ine FINAL1 ;


! Old, not used, retained at the moment to remember the history:
!LEXICON I-CLASS ! Links from propernoun (revise?)
!  :%>i   IJ-CASE ; ! others have -ine etc.
!                I-EVEN ;
!                I-ODD ;
!
!LEXICON I-EVEN
!  +Pl+Ela:%>ijste FINAL1  ; ! Ela has -iste
!
!LEXICON I-ODD
!  +Pl+Ela:%>ijstie FINAL1  ; ! Ela has -iste



! Special for cns-final names, due to nomsg
! =========================================

! LEXICON CNAME_ODD_SG !(still) not in use
!  NOMSG ;
!  OBLIQUE_COMMON ;
!  OBLIQUE_ODD ;
!
!LEXICON CNAME_EVEN_SG !(still) not in use
! NOMSG ;
! OBLIQUE_COMMON ;
! OBLIQUE_EVEN ;


! LEXICON NOMSG !(still) not in use
!   +Sg+Nom:           FINAL1 ;
!
! LEXICON OBLIQUE_COMMON !(still) not in use
!   +Sg+Acc:e%>m      FINAL1 ;
!   +Sg+Gen:e%>n      FINAL1 ;
!
! LEXICON OBLIQUE_ODD !(still) not in use
!   +Sg+Ine:e%>snie   FINAL1 ;
!   +Sg+Ela:e%>stie   FINAL1 ;
!   +Sg+Com:e%>nie    FINAL1 ;

! LEXICON OBLIQUE_EVEN !(still) not in use
!   +Sg+Ine:e%>sne    FINAL1 ;
!   +Sg+Ela:e%>ste    FINAL1 ;
!   +Sg+Com:e%>ne     FINAL1 ;

! ---- Nominal derivation sublexica ----

LEXICON GIERIEHTSADTJE
       +Sg:     NIEJTE_SG ;
       +Pl:     NIEJTE_PL ;
                EVEN_ESS  ;
 +Cmp/SgNom:e    R         ;
 +Cmp/SgGen:e%>n R         ;
 +Cmp/PlGen:%>i  R         ;

LEXICON GÅATETJE
       +Sg:            N_ODD_SG  ;
       +Pl:            N_ODD_PL  ;
                       N_ODD_ESS ;
 +Cmp/SgNom:e           R         ;
 +Cmp/SgGen:e%>n        R         ;
 +Cmp/PlGen:%>%^DISIMPi R         ;
